src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns-old.lexc
LEXICON N_УРДЭС
:%^SYNC jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдсын
:К3 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V ; !урдэскын
 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON N_СЮЛЭМ
:%^SYNC jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлмын
 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V ; !сюлэмын
 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_C ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF
+N: NOUNSUF_01 ;

LEXICON NOUNSUF_01
+Sg: CASESUF ;
+Pl:%>ъёс CASESUF ;
+Sg: PREPX ;
+Sg: POSTPX ;
+Pl:%>ъёс PREPX ;
+Pl:%>ъёс POSTPX ;

LEXICON CASESUF
+Nom:%> K;
+Acc:%>эз K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>лэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Ins:%>эн K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Ine:%>ын K;
+Ill:%>э K;
+Ela:%>ысь K;
+Egr:%>ысен K;
+Ter:%>озь K;
+Prl:%>этӥ K;
+Apr:%>лань K;

LEXICON PREPX
+PxSg1: POSTCX;
+PxSg2:%>д POSTCX;
+PxSg3:%>з POSTCX;
+PxPl1:%>мы POSTCX;
+PxPl2:%>ды POSTCX;
+PxPl3:%>зы POSTCX;

LEXICON POSTCX
+Acc:%>э K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>ляэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Apr:%>лань K;
+Prl:%>озь K;

LEXICON POSTPX
+Nom:%>э CXPXSG ;
+Nom:%> CXPXPL ; ! also for other cases?
+Ins:%>ены CXPX ;
+Ine:%>а CXPX ;
+Ill:%>а CXPX ;
+Ela:%>ысьти CXPX ;
+Egr:%>ысьены CXPX ;
+Tra:%>ети CXPX ;
+Ter:%>озьа CXPX ;

LEXICON CXPX
CXPXSG ;
CXPXPL ;

LEXICON CXPXSG
+PxSg1: K;
+PxSg2:%>д K;
+PxSg3:%>з K;

LEXICON CXPXPL
+PxPl1:%>мы K;
+PxPl2:%>ды K;
+PxPl3:%>зы K;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;

!! À la Jaska
LEXICON jaskaNOUNSUF
+N: jaskaNOUNSUF_01 ;

LEXICON jaskaNOUNSUF_01
 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_C ;
 jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V ;

LEXICON jaskaNOUNSUF_01_C
+Sg: jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;
+Pl:%>ъёс jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C ;

LEXICON jaskaNOUNSUF_01_V
+Sg: jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Pl:%>ъёс jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V ;
+Sg+Ter+PxPl1:%>озямы K ; !Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl2:%>озяды K ; ! Sg
+Sg+Ter+PxPl3:%>озязы K ; !Sg

LEXICON jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_C
+Nom:%> K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>лэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Apr:%>лань K;
! with possession
+Nom+PxPl1:%>мы K ;
+Nom+PxPl2:%>ды K ;
+Nom+PxPl3:%>зы K ;

+Acc+PxSg1:%>ме K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:%>тэ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:%>сэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:%>мес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:%>тэс K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:%>сэс K ;

+Gen+PxPl1:%>мылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl2:%>тылэн K ;
+Gen+PxPl3:%>сылэн K ;

+Abl+PxPl1:%>мылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl2:%>тылэсь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:%>сылэсь K ;

+Dat+PxPl1:%>мылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:%>тылы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:%>сылы K ;

+Abe+PxPl1:%>мытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl2:%>тытэк K ;
+Abe+PxPl3:%>сытэк K ;

+Advl+PxPl1:%>мыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl2:%>тыя K ;
+Advl+PxPl3:%>сыя K ;

+Ter+PxPl1:%>мыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:%>тыозь K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:%>сыозь K ;

+Apr+PxPl1:%>мылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:%>тылань K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:%>сылань K ;

LEXICON jaskaAFTER-SG/PL-CASE_V
+Acc:%>Е3з K;
+Ins:%>эн K;
+Ine:%>ын K;
+Ill:%>Е3 K;
+Ela:%>ысь K;
+Egr:%>ысен K;
+Ter:%>озь K;
+Prl:%>этӥ K;

! with possession
+Nom+PxSg1:%>Е3 K ;
+Nom+PxSg2:%>Е3д K ;
+Nom+PxSg3:%>Е3з K ;

+Gen+PxSg1:%>Е3лэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg2:%>Е3длэн K ;
+Gen+PxSg3:%>Е3злэн K ;

+Abl+PxSg1:%>Е3лэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg2:%>Е3длэсь K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:%>Е3злэсь K ;

+Dat+PxSg1:%>Е3лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg2:%>Е3длы K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:%>Е3злы K ;

+Ins+PxSg1:%>Е3ным K ;
+Ins+PxSg2:%>Е3ныд K ;
+Ins+PxSg3:%>Е3ныз K ;
+Ins+PxPl1:%>Е3нымы K ;
+Ins+PxPl2:%>Е3ныды K ;
+Ins+PxPl3:%>Е3нызы K ;

+Abe+PxSg1:%>Е3тэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg2:%>Е3дтэк K ;
+Abe+PxSg3:%>Е3зтэк K ;

+Advl+PxSg1:%>Е3я K ;
+Advl+PxSg2:%>Е3дъя K ;
+Advl+PxSg3:%>Е3зъя K ;

+Ine+PxSg1:%>А3м K ;
+Ine+PxSg2:%>А3д K ;
+Ine+PxSg3:%>А3з K ;
+Ine+PxPl1:%>А3мы K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:%>А3ды K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:%>А3зы K ;

+Ill+PxSg1:%>А3м K ;
+Ill+PxSg2:%>А3д K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:%>А3з K ;
+Ill+PxPl1:%>А3мы K ;
+Ill+PxPl2:%>А3ды K ;
+Ill+PxPl3:%>А3зы K ;

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысьтым K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысьтыд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысьтыз K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысьтымы K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысьтыды K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысьтызы K ;

+Ela+PxSg1:%>ысеным K ;
+Ela+PxSg2:%>ысеныд K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:%>ысеныз K ;
+Ela+PxPl1:%>ысенымы K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:%>ысеныды K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:%>ысенызы K ;

+Ter+PxSg1:%>озям K ;
+Ter+PxSg2:%>озяд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:%>озяз K ;

+Prl+PxSg1:%>этӥм K ;
+Prl+PxSg2:%>этӥд K ;
+Prl+PxSg3:%>этӥз K ;
+Prl+PxPl1:%>этӥмы K ;
+Prl+PxPl2:%>этӥды K ;
+Prl+PxPl3:%>этӥзы K ;

+Apr+PxSg1:%>элань K ;
+Apr+PxSg2:%>эдлань K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:%>эзлань K ;



LEXICON jaskaPREPX
+PxSg1: jaskaPOSTCX;
+PxSg2:%>д jaskaPOSTCX;
+PxSg3:%>з jaskaPOSTCX;
+PxPl1:%>мы jaskaPOSTCX;
+PxPl2:%>ды jaskaPOSTCX;
+PxPl3:%>зы jaskaPOSTCX;

LEXICON jaskaPOSTCX
+Acc:%>Е3 K;
+Acc+Dial/North:%>ты K;
+Gen:%>ляэн K;
+Abl:%>лэсь K;
+Dat:%>лы K;
+Abe:%>тэк K;
+Advl:%>ъя K;
+Apr:%>лань K;
+Prl:%>озь K;

LEXICON jaskaPOSTPX
+Nom:%>Е3 jaskaCXPXSG ;
+Nom:%> jaskaCXPXPL ; ! also for other cases?
+Ins:%>ены jaskaCXPX ;
+Ine:%>а jaskaCXPX ;
+Ill:%>а jaskaCXPX ;
+Ela:%>ысьти jaskaCXPX ;
+Egr:%>ысьены jaskaCXPX ;
+Tra:%>ети jaskaCXPX ;
+Ter:%>озьа jaskaCXPX ;

LEXICON jaskaCXPX
jaskaCXPXSG ;
jaskaCXPXPL ;

LEXICON jaskaCXPXSG
+PxSg1: K;
+PxSg2:%>д K;
+PxSg3:%>з K;

LEXICON jaskaCXPXPL
+PxPl1:%>мы K;
+PxPl2:%>ды K;
+PxPl3:%>зы K;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
